Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-405.02
Contiguous land, defined.

For purposes of section 17-405.01, lands, lots, tracts, streets, or highways shall be deemed contiguous although a stream, roadway, embankment, strip, or parcel of land not more than five hundred feet wide lies between such lands, lots, tracts, streets, or highways and the corporate limits of a city of the second class or village.

Laws 1967, c. 74, § 2, p. 241;

Laws 1971, LB 890, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 111.